Vermont, session 2025-2026, H830.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) In September 2025, the National Education Policy Center (NEPC)
reported that “research has not supported the common-sense presumption that
VT LEG #386130 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.830
2026 Page 2 of 4
digital approaches to schooling are better than non-digital alternatives. At the
broadest level, widespread computer use in education has been found to be
associated with lower student achievement.”
(2) The NEPC also warned of the harmful data collection practices
utilized by so-called “ed tech” products, explaining that “the same platform
that delivers curricular materials to students also harvests, for example, those
students’ usage patterns, performance data, and engagement metrics… often
without the knowledge or consent of students, families, or educators.”
(3) After initially mandating the widespread adoption of technology in
schools, and subsequently prompted by sharp declines in student achievement,
the Swedish government has invested millions of dollars to ensure that
students have more access to textbooks. The Swedish government also
amended national curriculum requirements to say that “only analog learning
tools, such as books, should be used for children under the age of two and that
potential use of non-analog learning tools should be greatly restricted for all
other children.”
(4) In a 2025 national survey conducted by The New York Times, 70
percent of teachers said that school-issued devices distract students from
learning and engagement in class, and a majority said students had “used them
to play games or watch videos unrelated to school.”
VT LEG #386130 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.830
2026 Page 3 of 4
(5) Vermont students’ reading test scores have declined significantly
since 2016, and currently sit at an all-time low. Also in 2016, the Agency of
Education reported a dramatic increase in one-to-one devices for students. In
fact, that year there were 85,000 computers for student use in Vermont schools,
which is more than the total number of students in Vermont schools.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. STUDENT AND PARENT OR GUARDIAN RIGHT OF REFUSAL;
ELECTRONIC DEVICE USAGE
(a) A student or parent or guardian of a student in a public elementary or
secondary school or an approved independent school shall have the right to
refuse to use an electronic device in order to perform work forming part of a
course of instruction.
(b) Each school district and approved independent school shall adopt and
implement policies regarding a student’s or parent’s or guardian’s right of
refusal under this section, which shall include:
(1) the process by which a student or parent or guardian may exercise
this right;
(2) alternative education methods through which a student exercising the
right under this section can learn and be assessed on material required by the
course; and
VT LEG #386130 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.830
2026 Page 4 of 4
(3) a statement that no student shall be discriminated against or
penalized for the decision to exercise the right of refusal afforded by this
section.
(c) A teacher employed by a public school or approved independent school
shall not be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned, or transferred for
choosing to teach a class or portions of a class without the use of electronic
devices.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386130 v.3